North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-36 Tobacco Products Tax Law
57-36-27.
Consumer’s use tax — Cigarettes — Reports — Remittances.

A tax is hereby imposed upon the use or storage by consumers of cigarettes in this state, and upon such consumers, at the following rates:

On cigarettes weighing not more than three pounds [1360.78 grams] per thousand, five mills on each such cigarette.

On cigarettes weighing more than three pounds [1360.78 grams] per thousand, five and one-half mills on each such cigarette.

This tax does not apply if the tax imposed by section 57-36-06 has been paid.

On or before the tenth day of each calendar quarter, every consumer who during the preceding calendar quarter has acquired title or possession of cigarettes for use or storage in this state, upon which cigarettes the tax imposed by section 57-36-06 has not been paid, shall file a return with the tax commissioner showing the quantity of cigarettes so acquired. The return must be made upon a form furnished and prescribed by the tax commissioner and must contain such other information as the tax commissioner may require. The return must be accompanied by a remittance for the full unpaid tax liability shown by it.

As soon as practicable after any return is filed, the tax commissioner shall examine the return and correct it, if necessary, according to the tax commissioner’s best judgment and information.

In case any consumer required to pay the tax levied by this section fails to file a return or remit the tax as herein required, the tax commissioner has the authority to make an assessment of tax against the consumer according to the commissioner’s best judgment and information.

All of the provisions of this chapter relating to corrections of returns, deficiency assessments, protests thereto, hearings thereon, interest and penalties, and collections of taxes are applicable to consumers under this section in like manner as though set out in full herein.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 403, § 18; 1969, ch. 498, § 3; 2005, ch. 449, § 2.

57-36-28.
Consumer’s use tax — Cigars, pipe tobacco, and other tobacco products — Reports — Remittances.

A tax is imposed upon the use or storage by consumers of cigars, pipe tobacco, and other tobacco products in this state, and upon those consumers, at the rates indicated in section 57-36-25.

This tax does not apply if the tax imposed by section 57-36-25 or 57-36-26 has been paid and it does not apply to cigars, pipe tobacco, or other tobacco products exempt under section 57-36-24.

On or before the tenth day of each calendar quarter, every consumer who, during the preceding calendar quarter, has acquired title to or possession of cigars, pipe tobacco, or other tobacco products for use or storage in this state, upon which products the tax imposed by either section 57-36-25 or 57-36-26 has not been paid, shall file a return with the tax commissioner showing the quantity of such products so acquired. For sales of other tobacco products, the return must also include the net weight in ounces, as listed by the manufacturer. The return must be made upon a form furnished and prescribed by the tax commissioner and must contain such other information as the tax commissioner may require. The return must be accompanied by a remittance for the full unpaid tax liability shown by it.

As soon as practicable after any return is filed, the tax commissioner shall examine the return and correct it, if necessary, according to the tax commissioner’s best judgment and information.

If any consumer required to pay the tax levied by this section fails to file a return or remit the tax as required, the tax commissioner shall make an assessment of tax against the consumer according to the tax commissioner’s best judgment and information.

All of the provisions of this chapter relating to corrections of returns, deficiency assessments, protests, hearings, interest and penalties, and collections of taxes apply to consumers under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 403, § 19; 1987, ch. 685, § 3; 1991, ch. 666, § 3; 1993, ch. 501, § 4; 2001, ch. 520, § 5.

57-36-29.
Correction of errors.

If it appears that as a result of a mistake an amount of tax, penalty, or interest has been paid which was not due under the provisions of this chapter, then such amount becomes due under this chapter, and the amount must be credited or refunded to such person or firm by the tax commissioner.

Whenever a distributor destroys cigarettes, cigars, pipe tobacco, or other tobacco products accidentally, or intentionally, because of staleness or other unfitness for sale, a credit or refund must be given to the wholesaler under the terms and conditions prescribed by the tax commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 403, § 20; 1967, ch. 439, § 4; 2001, ch. 520, § 6.

57-36-30.
Issuance of credit or refund.

Whenever by any provisions of this chapter a credit or refund is authorized, the tax commissioner shall issue a credit applicable to future obligations under this chapter or certify the amount of the refund, the reason therefor, and the name of the payee to the director of the office of management and budget, who shall thereupon draw a warrant on the fund to which the payment had been credited in the amount specified payable to the named payee.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 403, § 21.

57-36-31.
Transfer and allocation of revenues — Appropriation.

All moneys received by the tax commissioner under the provisions of this chapter must be transmitted to the state treasurer at the end of each month and deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the general fund, except as hereinafter provided.

All moneys received from the levy and assessment of one and one-half mills on each of the classes of cigarettes provided in this chapter are appropriated and must be distributed on or before the thirtieth day of June and the thirty-first day of December of each year on a per capita basis to the incorporated cities for such purposes as are now or may be hereafter authorized by law, the allocation to be based upon the population of each incorporated city according to the last official federal census, or the census taken in accordance with the provisions of chapter 40-02 in the case of a city incorporated subsequent to the last federal census, and warrants must be drawn payable to the treasurers of such cities.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 403, § 22; 1969, ch. 498, § 4.

57-36-32.
Separate and additional tax on the sale of cigarettes — Collection — Allocation of revenue — Tax avoidance prohibited.

There is hereby levied and assessed and there shall be collected by the state tax commissioner and paid to the state treasurer, upon all cigarettes sold in this state, an additional tax, separate and apart from all other taxes, of seventeen mills on each cigarette, to be collected as existing taxes on cigarettes sold are, or hereafter may be, collected, by use of appropriate stamps and under similar accounting procedures. No person, firm, corporation, or limited liability company shall transport or bring or cause to be shipped into the state of North Dakota any cigarettes as provided herein, other than for delivery to wholesalers in this state, without first paying the tax thereon to the state tax commissioner. All of the moneys collected by the state treasurer under this section shall be credited to the state general fund.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 405, § 1; 1975, ch. 106, § 605; 1979, ch. 551, § 7; 1979, ch. 598, § 5; 1983, ch. 621, § 1; 1987, ch. 686, § 1; 1987, ch. 687, § 1; 1991, ch. 666, § 4; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 501, § 5.

Cross-References.

Excise tax on cigarettes sold in state, see N.D.C.C. § 57-36-06.

57-36-33.
Penalties for violation of chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter:

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

All cigarettes, cigarette papers, cigars, pipe tobacco, or other tobacco products in the possession of the person who violates any provision of this chapter, or in the place of business of the person, may be confiscated by the tax commissioner as provided under section 57-36-14 and forfeited to the state. Any cigarette-making machine that is maintained or operated in violation of sections 57-36-05.3, 57-36-05.4, or 57-36-06.1 must be confiscated by the tax commissioner and forfeited to the state in accordance with chapter 29-31.1.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 606; 1991, ch. 665, § 9; 2001, ch. 520, § 7; 2013, ch. 450, § 5.